Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 16

Office of Legislative Information Systems

3-16-101. Creation — Duties.

There is created the office of legislative information systems for the general assembly, which has the duty to:

Operate an automated data processing center and perform computing and programming services as are required for data processing applications by the members of the general assembly, the legislative committees, the offices of legislative administration and legal services, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, and the fiscal review committee in the performing of their respective duties;

Cooperate and consult with the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the directors of all offices under the control of the committee in developing and maintaining computer programs and services required for the operation of such offices;

Advise the joint legislative services committee on matters relating to computer services and computer needs and uses of the legislative computer system;

Maintain on its electronic data processing equipment the complete text of Tennessee Code Annotated for the use of the general assembly and its staff and the Tennessee code commission and its staff;

Coordinate and administer the scheduling and use of computer programs and machine time to facilitate application of computer and other office machine technology for the storing and retrieving all of the financial, factual, procedural, legal and other information necessary to serve all of the committees, officers and agencies of the general assembly; and

Perform all other duties the joint legislative services committee, the speakers, or the general assembly may deem essential to the efficient operation of the legislative branch.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 2; 2010, ch. 1077, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1 repealed provisions concerning the office of legislative services, effective June 21, 2010. In subdivision (1), “, legislative services” was deleted following “the offices of legislative administration” by the code commission in 2010.

Cross-References. Access to legislative computer system, reproduction of Tennessee Code Annotated, §3-10-108.

Legislative computer access and information, violations, §3-10-109.

Legislative information systems, select advisory council, staff user group, §3-10-107.

3-16-102. Director of legislative information systems.

The joint legislative services committee shall appoint, subject to the approval of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, a director of legislative information systems, who shall be a graduate of an accredited college or university and shall have not less than five (5) years of practical experience in computer technology, including administrative and technical responsibility for developing and implementing a computer-oriented data processing system. The director and other personnel shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the committee. The committee shall determine the compensation of the director, while the compensation of other personnel shall be determined by the committee upon recommendation of the director. Personnel shall be employed on recommendation of the director with the approval of the speakers.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 3; 2010, ch. 1077, § 2.

Cross-References. Access to legislative computer system, reproduction of Tennessee Code Annotated, §3-10-108.

Legislative computer access and information, violations, §3-10-109.

Legislative information systems, select advisory council, staff user group, §3-10-107.

3-16-103. Control, operation, and maintenance of legislative computer system and equipment.

The joint legislative services committee shall, through the office of legislative information systems, control, operate, and maintain the legislative computer system and the use of electronic data processing equipment in the legislative branch. The committee shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines for such system. The provisions of §3-10-104 shall be applicable to such policies, procedures, and guidelines.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 4; 2010, ch. 1077, § 2.

Cross-References. Access to legislative computer system, reproduction of Tennessee Code Annotated, §3-10-108.

Legislative computer access and information, violations, §3-10-109.

Legislative information systems, select advisory council, staff user group, §3-10-107.

3-16-104. Office space and facilities.

Suitable office space and facilities shall be provided in Nashville convenient to the general assembly.

Acts 1987, ch. 163, § 5.